Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.080

Offers to sell or buy in this state—Application of RCW 21.30.020, 21.30.050, and 21.30.060.

(1) RCW 21.30.020, 21.30.050, and 21.30.060 apply to persons who sell or offer to sell when an offer to sell is made in this state or an offer to buy is made and accepted in this state.

(2) RCW 21.30.020, 21.30.050, and 21.30.060 apply to persons who buy or offer to buy when an offer to buy is made in this state or an offer to sell is made and accepted in this state.

(3) For the purpose of this section, an offer to sell or to buy is made in this state, whether or not either party is then present in this state, when the offer originates from this state or is directed by the offeror to this state and received at the place to which it is directed, or at any post office in this state in the case of a mailed offer.

(4) For the purpose of this section, an offer to buy or to sell is accepted in this state when acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state and has not previously been communicated to the offeror, orally or in writing, outside this state, or whether or not either party is then present in this state, when the offeree directs it to the offeror in this state reasonably believing the offeror to be in this state and it is received at the place to which it is directed, or at any post office in this state in the case of a mailed acceptance.

[ 1986 c 14 s 8.]